District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.13

Repealed

Accident report — Additional information to be furnished on request.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 124, ch. 222, § 13
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1973 Ed., § 40-429.
1981 Ed., § 40-413.